District of Columbia statutes.
50-2301.01

Purposes.

It is the intent of the Council of the District of Columbia (hereinafter referred to as the “Council”) in the adoption of this chapter to decriminalize and to provide for the administrative adjudication of certain violations of Title 32 of the District of Columbia Rules and Regulations (Motor Vehicle Regulations for the District of Columbia), and certain offenses codified in Title 50 of the District of Columbia Official Code, in the Highways and Traffic Regulations of the District of Columbia, and in Chapter III of Title 14 of the District of Columbia Rules and Regulations (relating to the operation of taxicabs), and to provide for the civilian enforcement of parking infractions, and thereby to establish a uniform and more expeditious system and continue to assure an equitable system for the disposition of traffic offenses.

Sept. 12, 1978, D.C. Law 2-104, § 101, 25 DCR 1275
This section is referenced in § 9-1111.15, § 47-2829, § 47-2862, § 50-405.01, § 50-1501.04, § 50-2201.03, § 50-2201.04, and § 50-2201.28.
1981 Ed., § 40-601.
1973 Ed., § 40-1101.

Title 18 of the DCMR (Vehicles and Traffic) (June, 1987) has replaced Title 32 of the District of Columbia Rules and Regulations (Motor Vehicle Regulations for the District of Columbia).

Title 18A of the DCMR (Taxicabs and Vehicles for Hire) (October, 1987) has replaced Title 14 of the District of Columbia Rules and Regulations (relating to operation of taxicabs).